Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
610

RETIREMENT
AND REMOVAL OF JUSTICES AND JUDGES

REPEALED. L 1980, c 263, §1.

Cross References

Constitutional provisions on retirement, removal, and
discipline, see Const. art. VI, §5.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next